Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.104

Annual increase in benefits payable on retirement for service or disability—Appeals.

The amount of all benefits payable under the provisions of RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, 41.18.100 and 41.18.200 as now or hereafter amended, shall be increased annually as hereafter in this section provided. The local pension board shall meet subsequent to March 31st but prior to June 30th of each year for the purpose of adjusting benefit allowances payable pursuant to the aforementioned sections. The local board shall determine the increase in the consumer price index between January 1st and December 31st of the previous year and increase in dollar amount the benefits payable subsequent to July 1st of the year in which said board makes such determination by a dollar amount proportionate to the increase in the consumer price index: PROVIDED, That regardless of the change in the consumer price index, such increase shall be at least two percent each year such adjustment is made.

Each year effective with the July payment all benefits specified herein, shall be increased as authorized by this section. This benefit increase shall be paid monthly as part of the regular pension payment and shall be cumulative. The increased benefits authorized by this section shall not affect any benefit payable under the provisions of chapter 41.18 RCW in which the benefit payment is attached to a current salary of the rank held at time of retirement. A beneficiary of benefit increases provided for pursuant to this section is hereby authorized to appeal a decision on such increases or the failure of the local pension board to order such increased benefits or the amount of such benefits to the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system retirement board provided for in *RCW 41.26.050.

For the purpose of this section the term

"Consumer price index" shall mean, for any calendar year, the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 44 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 190 s 2; 1970 ex.s. c 37 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 33.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.26.050 was repealed by 1982 c 163 s 23. Powers, duties, and functions of the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement board were transferred to the director of retirement systems by RCW 41.26.051, which has been decodified. See Table of Disposition of Former RCW Sections.

Construction—1975 1st ex.s. c 178: See RCW 41.16.921.

Construction—1970 ex.s. c 37: "This 1970 amendatory act shall be null and void and of no further force and effect if the 1970 extraordinary session of the Legislature does not pass legislation authorizing cities and counties to levy additional taxes or appropriate at least ten million dollars for distribution to cities and towns for the remainder of the 1969-71 fiscal biennium." [ 1970 ex.s. c 37 s 4.]

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.